en: Duplication operation mode: PC-connected; Standalone; Standalone and PC-connected; Other
ja: 複製操作モード: PC接続式; スタンドアロン; スタンドアロン・PC接続両対応; その他
es: Modo de operación de duplicación: Conectado a PC; Independiente; Independiente y conectado a PC; Otros
it: Modalità di funzionamento della duplicazione: Connesso al PC; Autonomo; Autonomo e connesso al PC; Altro
tr: Çoğaltma çalışma modu: Bilgisayar bağlantılı; Bağımsız; Bağımsız ve bilgisayar bağlantılı; Diğer
da: Duplikeringsdriftstilstand: PC-forbundet; Fritstående; Selvstændig og PC-forbundet; Andet
pl: Tryb pracy duplikatora: Podłączony do komputera; Samodzielne; Samodzielny i podłączony do komputera; Inne
ro-RO: Mod de operare duplicare: Conectat la PC; Autonom; Independent și conectat la PC; Altele
zh-CN: 复制操作模式: PC 连接; 独立式; 独立式和 PC 连接式; 其他
sv: Duplikeringsläge: PC-ansluten; Fristående; Fristående och PC-ansluten; Övrigt
ru: Режим работы двусторонней печати: Подключение к ПК; Отдельный; Автономный и с подключением к ПК; Другой
nl: Beschrijft de oppervlaktecoating of afwerking van het digitizerglas.: Pc-verbonden; Autonoom; Zelfstandig en pc-verbonden; Andere
ko: 복제 작동 모드: PC 연결형; 독립형; 독립형 및 PC 연결형; 기타
sk-SK: Režim prevádzky duplikátora: Pripojené k PC; Samostatný; Samostatné a pripojené k PC; Iné
lt-LT: Dubliavimo veikimo režimas: Prijungtas prie kompiuterio; Autonominis; Savarankiškas ir prijungtas prie kompiuterio; Kita
hr-HR: Način rada dupliciranja: Povezan s računalom; Samostalno; Samostalan i povezan s računalom; Ostalo
bg-BG: Режим на работа при дублиране: Свързан с компютър; Самостоятелен; Самостоятелен и свързан с компютър; Други
pt-PT: Modo de operação de duplicação: Ligado ao PC; Autónomo; Autónomo e ligado ao PC; Outro
el: Λειτουργία αντιγραφής: Συνδεδεμένο σε υπολογιστή; Αυτόνομο; Αυτόνομο και συνδεδεμένο σε υπολογιστή; Άλλο
pt-BR: Modo de operação de duplicação: Conectado ao PC; Autônomo; Autônomo e conectado ao PC; Outro
cs: Režim provozu duplikátoru: Připojeno k PC; Samostatné; Samostatné a připojeno k PC; Jiné
fi: Kopioinnin toimintatila: PC-yhteys; Itsenäinen; Itsenäinen ja PC-yhteys; Muu
de: Duplizierungs-Betriebsmodus: PC-verbunden; Alleinstehend; Eigenständig und PC-verbunden; Sonstiges
nb: Dupliseringsoperasjonsmodus: PC-tilkoblet; Frittstående; Frittstående og PC-tilkoblet; Annet
zh-TW: 複製操作模式: 電腦連接; 獨立式; 獨立運作和電腦連接; 其他
sl-SI: Način delovanja podvojevanja: Povezan z računalnikom; Samostojen; Samostojen in povezan z računalnikom; Drugo
th: โหมดการทำงานของการทำซ้ำ: เชื่อมต่อกับพีซี; สแตนด์อโลน; แบบอิสระและเชื่อมต่อกับพีซี; อื่นๆ
hu: Másolási működési mód: PC-hez csatlakoztatott; Önálló; Önálló és PC-hez csatlakoztatott; Egyéb
fr: Mode de fonctionnement de la duplication: Connecté au PC; Autonome; Autonome et connecté au PC; Autre
vi: Chế độ hoạt động sao chép: Kết nối PC; Độc lập; Độc lập và kết nối PC; Khác